Illinois, session 104th, HB7.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Identification Act is amended by 5changing Section 5.2 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2630/5.2)7    Sec. 5.2. Expungement, sealing, and immediate sealing.8    (a) General Provisions.9        (1) Definitions. In this Act, words and phrases have 10    the meanings set forth in this subsection, except when a 11    particular context clearly requires a different meaning.12            (A) The following terms shall have the meanings 13        ascribed to them in the following Sections of the 14        Unified Code of Corrections:15                Business Offense, Section 5-1-2.16                Charge, Section 5-1-3.17                Court, Section 5-1-6.18                Defendant, Section 5-1-7.19                Felony, Section 5-1-9.20                Imprisonment, Section 5-1-10.21                Judgment, Section 5-1-12.22                Misdemeanor, Section 5-1-14.23                Offense, Section 5-1-15.  HB0007- 2 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1                Parole, Section 5-1-16.2                Petty Offense, Section 5-1-17.3                Probation, Section 5-1-18.4                Sentence, Section 5-1-19.5                Supervision, Section 5-1-21.6                Victim, Section 5-1-22.7            (B) As used in this Section, "charge not initiated 8        by arrest" means a charge (as defined by Section 5-1-3 9        of the Unified Code of Corrections) brought against a 10        defendant where the defendant is not arrested prior to 11        or as a direct result of the charge.12            (C) "Conviction" means a judgment of conviction or 13        sentence entered upon a plea of guilty or upon a 14        verdict or finding of guilty of an offense, rendered 15        by a legally constituted jury or by a court of 16        competent jurisdiction authorized to try the case 17        without a jury. An order of supervision successfully 18        completed by the petitioner is not a conviction. An 19        order of qualified probation (as defined in subsection 20        (a)(1)(J)) successfully completed by the petitioner is 21        not a conviction. An order of supervision or an order 22        of qualified probation that is terminated 23        unsatisfactorily is a conviction, unless the 24        unsatisfactory termination is reversed, vacated, or 25        modified and the judgment of conviction, if any, is 26        reversed or vacated.  HB0007- 3 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1            (D) "Criminal offense" means a petty offense, 2        business offense, misdemeanor, felony, or municipal 3        ordinance violation (as defined in subsection 4        (a)(1)(H)). As used in this Section, a minor traffic 5        offense (as defined in subsection (a)(1)(G)) shall not 6        be considered a criminal offense.7            (E) "Expunge" means to physically destroy the 8        records or return them to the petitioner and to 9        obliterate the petitioner's name from any official 10        index or public record, or both. Nothing in this Act 11        shall require the physical destruction of the circuit 12        court file, but such records relating to arrests or 13        charges, or both, ordered expunged shall be impounded 14        as required by subsections (d)(9)(A)(ii) and 15        (d)(9)(B)(ii).16            (F) As used in this Section, "last sentence" means 17        the sentence, order of supervision, or order of 18        qualified probation (as defined by subsection 19        (a)(1)(J)), for a criminal offense (as defined by 20        subsection (a)(1)(D)) that terminates last in time in 21        any jurisdiction, regardless of whether the petitioner 22        has included the criminal offense for which the 23        sentence or order of supervision or qualified 24        probation was imposed in his or her petition. If 25        multiple sentences, orders of supervision, or orders 26        of qualified probation terminate on the same day and   HB0007- 4 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1        are last in time, they shall be collectively 2        considered the "last sentence" regardless of whether 3        they were ordered to run concurrently.4            (G) "Minor traffic offense" means a petty offense, 5        business offense, or Class C misdemeanor under the 6        Illinois Vehicle Code or a similar provision of a 7        municipal or local ordinance.8            (G-5) "Minor Cannabis Offense" means a violation 9        of Section 4 or 5 of the Cannabis Control Act 10        concerning not more than 30 grams of any substance 11        containing cannabis, provided the violation did not 12        include a penalty enhancement under Section 7 of the 13        Cannabis Control Act and is not associated with an 14        arrest, conviction or other disposition for a violent 15        crime as defined in subsection (c) of Section 3 of the 16        Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act. 17            (H) "Municipal ordinance violation" means an 18        offense defined by a municipal or local ordinance that 19        is criminal in nature and with which the petitioner 20        was charged or for which the petitioner was arrested 21        and released without charging.22            (I) "Petitioner" means an adult or a minor 23        prosecuted as an adult who has applied for relief 24        under this Section.25            (J) "Qualified probation" means an order of 26        probation under Section 10 of the Cannabis Control   HB0007- 5 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1        Act, Section 410 of the Illinois Controlled Substances 2        Act, Section 70 of the Methamphetamine Control and 3        Community Protection Act, Section 5-6-3.3 or 5-6-3.4 4        of the Unified Code of Corrections, Section 5        12-4.3(b)(1) and (2) of the Criminal Code of 1961 (as 6        those provisions existed before their deletion by 7        Public Act 89-313), Section 10-102 of the Illinois 8        Alcoholism and Other Drug Dependency Act, Section 9        40-10 of the Substance Use Disorder Act, or Section 10 10        of the Steroid Control Act. For the purpose of this 11        Section, "successful completion" of an order of 12        qualified probation under Section 10-102 of the 13        Illinois Alcoholism and Other Drug Dependency Act and 14        Section 40-10 of the Substance Use Disorder Act means 15        that the probation was terminated satisfactorily and 16        the judgment of conviction was vacated.17            (K) "Seal" means to physically and electronically 18        maintain the records, unless the records would 19        otherwise be destroyed due to age, but to make the 20        records unavailable without a court order, subject to 21        the exceptions in Sections 12 and 13 of this Act. The 22        petitioner's name shall also be obliterated from the 23        official index required to be kept by the circuit 24        court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts 25        Act, but any index issued by the circuit court clerk 26        before the entry of the order to seal shall not be   HB0007- 6 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1        affected.2            (L) "Sexual offense committed against a minor" 3        includes, but is not limited to, the offenses of 4        indecent solicitation of a child or criminal sexual 5        abuse when the victim of such offense is under 18 years 6        of age.7            (M) "Terminate" as it relates to a sentence or 8        order of supervision or qualified probation includes 9        either satisfactory or unsatisfactory termination of 10        the sentence, unless otherwise specified in this 11        Section. A sentence is terminated notwithstanding any 12        outstanding financial legal obligation. 13        (2) Minor Traffic Offenses. Orders of supervision or 14    convictions for minor traffic offenses shall not affect a 15    petitioner's eligibility to expunge or seal records 16    pursuant to this Section.17        (2.5) Commencing 180 days after July 29, 2016 (the 18    effective date of Public Act 99-697), the law enforcement 19    agency issuing the citation shall automatically expunge, 20    on or before January 1 and July 1 of each year, the law 21    enforcement records of a person found to have committed a 22    civil law violation of subsection (a) of Section 4 of the 23    Cannabis Control Act or subsection (c) of Section 3.5 of 24    the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act in the law enforcement 25    agency's possession or control and which contains the 26    final satisfactory disposition which pertain to the person   HB0007- 7 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    issued a citation for that offense. The law enforcement 2    agency shall provide by rule the process for access, 3    review, and to confirm the automatic expungement by the 4    law enforcement agency issuing the citation. Commencing 5    180 days after July 29, 2016 (the effective date of Public 6    Act 99-697), the clerk of the circuit court shall expunge, 7    upon order of the court, or in the absence of a court order 8    on or before January 1 and July 1 of each year, the court 9    records of a person found in the circuit court to have 10    committed a civil law violation of subsection (a) of 11    Section 4 of the Cannabis Control Act or subsection (c) of 12    Section 3.5 of the Drug Paraphernalia Control Act in the 13    clerk's possession or control and which contains the final 14    satisfactory disposition which pertain to the person 15    issued a citation for any of those offenses. 16        (3) Exclusions. Except as otherwise provided in 17    subsections (b)(5), (b)(6), (b)(8), (e), (e-5), and (e-6) 18    of this Section, the court shall not order:19            (A) the sealing or expungement of the records of 20        arrests or charges not initiated by arrest that result 21        in an order of supervision for or conviction of: (i) 22        any sexual offense committed against a minor; (ii) 23        Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or a 24        similar provision of a local ordinance; or (iii) 25        Section 11-503 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or a 26        similar provision of a local ordinance, unless the   HB0007- 8 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1        arrest or charge is for a misdemeanor violation of 2        subsection (a) of Section 11-503 or a similar 3        provision of a local ordinance, that occurred prior to 4        the offender reaching the age of 25 years and the 5        offender has no other conviction for violating Section 6        11-501 or 11-503 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or a 7        similar provision of a local ordinance.8            (B) the sealing or expungement of records of minor 9        traffic offenses (as defined in subsection (a)(1)(G)), 10        unless the petitioner was arrested and released 11        without charging.12            (C) the sealing of the records of arrests or 13        charges not initiated by arrest which result in an 14        order of supervision or a conviction for the following 15        offenses:16                (i) offenses included in Article 11 of the 17            Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 18            or a similar provision of a local ordinance, 19            except Section 11-14 and a misdemeanor violation 20            of Section 11-30 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or 21            the Criminal Code of 2012, or a similar provision 22            of a local ordinance;23                (ii) Section 11-1.50, 12-3.4, 12-15, 12-30, 24            26-5, or 48-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 25            Criminal Code of 2012, or a similar provision of a 26            local ordinance;  HB0007- 9 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1                (iii) Section 12-3.1 or 12-3.2 of the Criminal 2            Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or 3            Section 125 of the Stalking No Contact Order Act, 4            or Section 219 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 5            or a similar provision of a local ordinance;6                (iv) Class A misdemeanors or felony offenses 7            under the Humane Care for Animals Act; or8                (v) any offense or attempted offense that 9            would subject a person to registration under the 10            Sex Offender Registration Act.11            (D) (blank).12    (b) Expungement.13        (1) A petitioner may petition the circuit court to 14    expunge the records of his or her arrests and charges not 15    initiated by arrest when each arrest or charge not 16    initiated by arrest sought to be expunged resulted in: (i) 17    acquittal, dismissal, or the petitioner's release without 18    charging, unless excluded by subsection (a)(3)(B); (ii) a 19    conviction which was vacated or reversed, unless excluded 20    by subsection (a)(3)(B); (iii) an order of supervision and 21    such supervision was successfully completed by the 22    petitioner, unless excluded by subsection (a)(3)(A) or 23    (a)(3)(B); or (iv) an order of qualified probation (as 24    defined in subsection (a)(1)(J)) and such probation was 25    successfully completed by the petitioner.26        (1.1) Notwithstanding the eligibility requirements of   HB0007- 10 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    this subsection (b), upon the issuance of a certificate of 2    expungement by the Prisoner Review Board under paragraph 3    (11) of subsection (a) of Section 3-3-2 of the Unified 4    Code of Corrections, the circuit court shall automatically 5    expunge all records of arrests or charges not initiated by 6    arrest and all court records that resulted in the 7    conviction for the Class 3 or Class 4 felony listed in the 8    certificate of expungement. 9        (1.5) When a petitioner seeks to have a record of 10    arrest expunged under this Section, and the offender has 11    been convicted of a criminal offense, the State's Attorney 12    may object to the expungement on the grounds that the 13    records contain specific relevant information aside from 14    the mere fact of the arrest. 15        (2) Time frame for filing a petition to expunge.16            (A) When the arrest or charge not initiated by 17        arrest sought to be expunged resulted in an acquittal, 18        dismissal, the petitioner's release without charging, 19        or the reversal or vacation of a conviction, there is 20        no waiting period to petition for the expungement of 21        such records.22            (A-5) In anticipation of the successful completion 23        of a problem-solving court, pre-plea diversion, or 24        post-plea diversion program, a petition for 25        expungement may be filed 61 days before the 26        anticipated dismissal of the case or any time   HB0007- 11 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1        thereafter. Upon successful completion of the program 2        and dismissal of the case, the court shall review the 3        petition of the person graduating from the program and 4        shall grant expungement if the petitioner meets all 5        requirements as specified in any applicable statute. 6            (B) When the arrest or charge not initiated by 7        arrest sought to be expunged resulted in an order of 8        supervision, successfully completed by the petitioner, 9        the following time frames will apply:10                (i) Those arrests or charges that resulted in 11            orders of supervision under Section 3-707, 3-708, 12            3-710, or 5-401.3 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or 13            a similar provision of a local ordinance, or under 14            Section 11-1.50, 12-3.2, or 12-15 of the Criminal 15            Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or a 16            similar provision of a local ordinance, shall not 17            be eligible for expungement until 5 years have 18            passed following the satisfactory termination of 19            the supervision.20                (i-5) Those arrests or charges that resulted 21            in orders of supervision for a misdemeanor 22            violation of subsection (a) of Section 11-503 of 23            the Illinois Vehicle Code or a similar provision 24            of a local ordinance, that occurred prior to the 25            offender reaching the age of 25 years and the 26            offender has no other conviction for violating   HB0007- 12 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1            Section 11-501 or 11-503 of the Illinois Vehicle 2            Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance 3            shall not be eligible for expungement until the 4            petitioner has reached the age of 25 years. 5                (ii) Those arrests or charges that resulted in 6            orders of supervision for any other offenses shall 7            not be eligible for expungement until 2 years have 8            passed following the satisfactory termination of 9            the supervision.10            (C) When the arrest or charge not initiated by 11        arrest sought to be expunged resulted in an order of 12        qualified probation, successfully completed by the 13        petitioner, such records shall not be eligible for 14        expungement until 5 years have passed following the 15        satisfactory termination of the probation.16        (3) Those records maintained by the Illinois State 17    Police for persons arrested prior to their 17th birthday 18    shall be expunged as provided in Section 5-915 of the 19    Juvenile Court Act of 1987.20        (4) Whenever a person has been arrested for or 21    convicted of any offense, in the name of a person whose 22    identity he or she has stolen or otherwise come into 23    possession of, the aggrieved person from whom the identity 24    was stolen or otherwise obtained without authorization, 25    upon learning of the person having been arrested using his 26    or her identity, may, upon verified petition to the chief   HB0007- 13 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    judge of the circuit wherein the arrest was made, have a 2    court order entered nunc pro tunc by the Chief Judge to 3    correct the arrest record, conviction record, if any, and 4    all official records of the arresting authority, the 5    Illinois State Police, other criminal justice agencies, 6    the prosecutor, and the trial court concerning such 7    arrest, if any, by removing his or her name from all such 8    records in connection with the arrest and conviction, if 9    any, and by inserting in the records the name of the 10    offender, if known or ascertainable, in lieu of the 11    aggrieved's name. The records of the circuit court clerk 12    shall be sealed until further order of the court upon good 13    cause shown and the name of the aggrieved person 14    obliterated on the official index required to be kept by 15    the circuit court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of 16    Courts Act, but the order shall not affect any index 17    issued by the circuit court clerk before the entry of the 18    order. Nothing in this Section shall limit the Illinois 19    State Police or other criminal justice agencies or 20    prosecutors from listing under an offender's name the 21    false names he or she has used.22        (5) Whenever a person has been convicted of criminal 23    sexual assault, aggravated criminal sexual assault, 24    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, criminal 25    sexual abuse, or aggravated criminal sexual abuse, the 26    victim of that offense may request that the State's   HB0007- 14 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    Attorney of the county in which the conviction occurred 2    file a verified petition with the presiding trial judge at 3    the petitioner's trial to have a court order entered to 4    seal the records of the circuit court clerk in connection 5    with the proceedings of the trial court concerning that 6    offense. However, the records of the arresting authority 7    and the Illinois State Police concerning the offense shall 8    not be sealed. The court, upon good cause shown, shall 9    make the records of the circuit court clerk in connection 10    with the proceedings of the trial court concerning the 11    offense available for public inspection.12        (6) If a conviction has been set aside on direct 13    review or on collateral attack and the court determines by 14    clear and convincing evidence that the petitioner was 15    factually innocent of the charge, the court that finds the 16    petitioner factually innocent of the charge shall enter an 17    expungement order for the conviction for which the 18    petitioner has been determined to be innocent as provided 19    in subsection (b) of Section 5-5-4 of the Unified Code of 20    Corrections.21        (7) Nothing in this Section shall prevent the Illinois 22    State Police from maintaining all records of any person 23    who is admitted to probation upon terms and conditions and 24    who fulfills those terms and conditions pursuant to 25    Section 10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of the 26    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, Section 70 of the   HB0007- 15 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 2    Section 5-6-3.3 or 5-6-3.4 of the Unified Code of 3    Corrections, Section 12-4.3 or subdivision (b)(1) of 4    Section 12-3.05 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 5    Criminal Code of 2012, Section 10-102 of the Illinois 6    Alcoholism and Other Drug Dependency Act, Section 40-10 of 7    the Substance Use Disorder Act, or Section 10 of the 8    Steroid Control Act.9        (8) If the petitioner has been granted a certificate 10    of innocence under Section 2-702 of the Code of Civil 11    Procedure, the court that grants the certificate of 12    innocence shall also enter an order expunging the 13    conviction for which the petitioner has been determined to 14    be innocent as provided in subsection (h) of Section 2-702 15    of the Code of Civil Procedure.16    (c) Sealing.17        (1) Applicability. Notwithstanding any other provision 18    of this Act to the contrary, and cumulative with any 19    rights to expungement of criminal records, this subsection 20    authorizes the sealing of criminal records of adults and 21    of minors prosecuted as adults. Subsection (g) of this 22    Section provides for immediate sealing of certain records. 23        (2) Eligible Records. The following records may be 24    sealed:25            (A) All arrests resulting in release without 26        charging;  HB0007- 16 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1            (B) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 2        resulting in acquittal, dismissal, or conviction when 3        the conviction was reversed or vacated, except as 4        excluded by subsection (a)(3)(B);5            (C) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 6        resulting in orders of supervision, including orders 7        of supervision for municipal ordinance violations, 8        successfully completed by the petitioner, unless 9        excluded by subsection (a)(3);10            (D) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 11        resulting in convictions, including convictions on 12        municipal ordinance violations, unless excluded by 13        subsection (a)(3);14            (E) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 15        resulting in orders of first offender probation under 16        Section 10 of the Cannabis Control Act, Section 410 of 17        the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, Section 70 of 18        the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection 19        Act, or Section 5-6-3.3 of the Unified Code of 20        Corrections; and21            (F) Arrests or charges not initiated by arrest 22        resulting in felony convictions unless otherwise 23        excluded by subsection (a) paragraph (3) of this 24        Section.25        (3) When Records Are Eligible to Be Sealed. Records 26    identified as eligible under subsection (c)(2) may be   HB0007- 17 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    sealed as follows:2            (A) Records identified as eligible under 3        subsections (c)(2)(A) and (c)(2)(B) may be sealed at 4        any time.5            (B) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph 6        (E) of this paragraph (3), records identified as 7        eligible under subsection (c)(2)(C) may be sealed 2 8        years after the termination of petitioner's last 9        sentence (as defined in subsection (a)(1)(F)).10            (C) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph 11        (E) of this paragraph (3), records identified as 12        eligible under subsections (c)(2)(D), (c)(2)(E), and 13        (c)(2)(F) may be sealed 3 years after the termination 14        of the petitioner's last sentence (as defined in 15        subsection (a)(1)(F)). Convictions requiring public 16        registration under the Arsonist Registry Act, the Sex 17        Offender Registration Act, or the Murderer and Violent 18        Offender Against Youth Registration Act may not be 19        sealed until the petitioner is no longer required to 20        register under that relevant Act.21            (D) Records identified in subsection 22        (a)(3)(A)(iii) may be sealed after the petitioner has 23        reached the age of 25 years. 24            (E) Records identified as eligible under 25        subsection (c)(2)(C), (c)(2)(D), (c)(2)(E), or 26        (c)(2)(F) may be sealed upon termination of the   HB0007- 18 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1        petitioner's last sentence if the petitioner earned a 2        high school diploma, associate's degree, career 3        certificate, vocational technical certification, or 4        bachelor's degree, or passed the high school level 5        Test of General Educational Development, during the 6        period of his or her sentence or mandatory supervised 7        release. This subparagraph shall apply only to a 8        petitioner who has not completed the same educational 9        goal prior to the period of his or her sentence or 10        mandatory supervised release. If a petition for 11        sealing eligible records filed under this subparagraph 12        is denied by the court, the time periods under 13        subparagraph (B) or (C) shall apply to any subsequent 14        petition for sealing filed by the petitioner.15        (4) Subsequent felony convictions. A person may not 16    have subsequent felony conviction records sealed as 17    provided in this subsection (c) if he or she is convicted 18    of any felony offense after the date of the sealing of 19    prior felony convictions as provided in this subsection 20    (c). The court may, upon conviction for a subsequent 21    felony offense, order the unsealing of prior felony 22    conviction records previously ordered sealed by the court.23        (5) Notice of eligibility for sealing. Upon entry of a 24    disposition for an eligible record under this subsection 25    (c), the petitioner shall be informed by the court of the 26    right to have the records sealed and the procedures for   HB0007- 19 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    the sealing of the records.2    (d) Procedure. The following procedures apply to 3expungement under subsections (b), (e), and (e-6) and sealing 4under subsections (c) and (e-5):5        (1) Filing the petition. Upon becoming eligible to 6    petition for the expungement or sealing of records under 7    this Section, the petitioner shall file a petition 8    requesting the expungement or sealing of records with the 9    clerk of the court where the arrests occurred or the 10    charges were brought, or both. If arrests occurred or 11    charges were brought in multiple jurisdictions, a petition 12    must be filed in each such jurisdiction. The petitioner 13    shall pay the applicable fee, except no fee shall be 14    required if the petitioner has obtained a court order 15    waiving fees under Supreme Court Rule 298 or it is 16    otherwise waived.17        (1.5) County fee waiver pilot program. From August 9, 18    2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-306) through 19    December 31, 2020, in a county of 3,000,000 or more 20    inhabitants, no fee shall be required to be paid by a 21    petitioner if the records sought to be expunged or sealed 22    were arrests resulting in release without charging or 23    arrests or charges not initiated by arrest resulting in 24    acquittal, dismissal, or conviction when the conviction 25    was reversed or vacated, unless excluded by subsection 26    (a)(3)(B). The provisions of this paragraph (1.5), other   HB0007- 20 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    than this sentence, are inoperative on and after January 2    1, 2022. 3        (2) Contents of petition. The petition shall be 4    verified and shall contain the petitioner's name, date of 5    birth, current address and, for each arrest or charge not 6    initiated by arrest sought to be sealed or expunged, the 7    case number, the date of arrest (if any), the identity of 8    the arresting authority, and such other information as the 9    court may require. During the pendency of the proceeding, 10    the petitioner shall promptly notify the circuit court 11    clerk of any change of his or her address. If the 12    petitioner has received a certificate of eligibility for 13    sealing from the Prisoner Review Board under paragraph 14    (10) of subsection (a) of Section 3-3-2 of the Unified 15    Code of Corrections, the certificate shall be attached to 16    the petition.17        (3) Drug test. The petitioner must attach to the 18    petition proof that the petitioner has taken within 30 19    days before the filing of the petition a test showing the 20    absence within his or her body of all illegal substances 21    as defined by the Illinois Controlled Substances Act and 22    the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act 23    if he or she is petitioning to:24            (A) seal felony records under clause (c)(2)(E);25            (B) seal felony records for a violation of the 26        Illinois Controlled Substances Act, the   HB0007- 21 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1        Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 2        or the Cannabis Control Act under clause (c)(2)(F);3            (C) seal felony records under subsection (e-5); or 4            (D) expunge felony records of a qualified 5        probation under clause (b)(1)(iv).6        (4) Service of petition. The circuit court clerk shall 7    promptly serve a copy of the petition and documentation to 8    support the petition under subsection (e-5) or (e-6) on 9    the State's Attorney or prosecutor charged with the duty 10    of prosecuting the offense, the Illinois State Police, the 11    arresting agency and the chief legal officer of the unit 12    of local government effecting the arrest.13        (5) Objections.14            (A) Any party entitled to notice of the petition 15        may file an objection to the petition. All objections 16        shall be in writing, shall be filed with the circuit 17        court clerk, and shall state with specificity the 18        basis of the objection. Whenever a person who has been 19        convicted of an offense is granted a pardon by the 20        Governor which specifically authorizes expungement, an 21        objection to the petition may not be filed.22            (B) Objections to a petition to expunge or seal 23        must be filed within 60 days of the date of service of 24        the petition.25        (6) Entry of order.26            (A) The Chief Judge of the circuit wherein the   HB0007- 22 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1        charge was brought, any judge of that circuit 2        designated by the Chief Judge, or in counties of less 3        than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the presiding trial judge 4        at the petitioner's trial, if any, shall rule on the 5        petition to expunge or seal as set forth in this 6        subsection (d)(6).7            (B) Unless the State's Attorney or prosecutor, the 8        Illinois State Police, the arresting agency, or the 9        chief legal officer files an objection to the petition 10        to expunge or seal within 60 days from the date of 11        service of the petition, the court shall enter an 12        order granting or denying the petition.13            (C) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 14        the court shall not deny a petition for sealing under 15        this Section because the petitioner has not satisfied 16        an outstanding legal financial obligation established, 17        imposed, or originated by a court, law enforcement 18        agency, or a municipal, State, county, or other unit 19        of local government, including, but not limited to, 20        any cost, assessment, fine, or fee. An outstanding 21        legal financial obligation does not include any court 22        ordered restitution to a victim under Section 5-5-6 of 23        the Unified Code of Corrections, unless the 24        restitution has been converted to a civil judgment. 25        Nothing in this subparagraph (C) waives, rescinds, or 26        abrogates a legal financial obligation or otherwise   HB0007- 23 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1        eliminates or affects the right of the holder of any 2        financial obligation to pursue collection under 3        applicable federal, State, or local law. 4            (D) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 5        the court shall not deny a petition to expunge or seal 6        under this Section because the petitioner has 7        submitted a drug test taken within 30 days before the 8        filing of the petition to expunge or seal that 9        indicates a positive test for the presence of cannabis 10        within the petitioner's body. In this subparagraph 11        (D), "cannabis" has the meaning ascribed to it in 12        Section 3 of the Cannabis Control Act. 13        (7) Hearings. If an objection is filed, the court 14    shall set a date for a hearing and notify the petitioner 15    and all parties entitled to notice of the petition of the 16    hearing date at least 30 days prior to the hearing. Prior 17    to the hearing, the State's Attorney shall consult with 18    the Illinois State Police as to the appropriateness of the 19    relief sought in the petition to expunge or seal. At the 20    hearing, the court shall hear evidence on whether the 21    petition should or should not be granted, and shall grant 22    or deny the petition to expunge or seal the records based 23    on the evidence presented at the hearing. The court may 24    consider the following:25            (A) the strength of the evidence supporting the 26        defendant's conviction;   HB0007- 24 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1            (B) the reasons for retention of the conviction 2        records by the State; 3            (C) the petitioner's age, criminal record history, 4        and employment history; 5            (D) the period of time between the petitioner's 6        arrest on the charge resulting in the conviction and 7        the filing of the petition under this Section; and 8            (E) the specific adverse consequences the 9        petitioner may be subject to if the petition is 10        denied. 11        (8) Service of order. After entering an order to 12    expunge or seal records, the court must provide copies of 13    the order to the Illinois State Police, in a form and 14    manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police, to the 15    petitioner, to the State's Attorney or prosecutor charged 16    with the duty of prosecuting the offense, to the arresting 17    agency, to the chief legal officer of the unit of local 18    government effecting the arrest, and to such other 19    criminal justice agencies as may be ordered by the court.20        (9) Implementation of order.21            (A) Upon entry of an order to expunge records 22        pursuant to subsection (b)(2)(A) or (b)(2)(B)(ii), or 23        both:24                (i) the records shall be expunged (as defined 25            in subsection (a)(1)(E)) by the arresting agency, 26            the Illinois State Police, and any other agency as   HB0007- 25 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1            ordered by the court, within 60 days of the date of 2            service of the order, unless a motion to vacate, 3            modify, or reconsider the order is filed pursuant 4            to paragraph (12) of subsection (d) of this 5            Section;6                (ii) the records of the circuit court clerk 7            shall be impounded until further order of the 8            court upon good cause shown and the name of the 9            petitioner obliterated on the official index 10            required to be kept by the circuit court clerk 11            under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts Act, but 12            the order shall not affect any index issued by the 13            circuit court clerk before the entry of the order; 14            and15                (iii) in response to an inquiry for expunged 16            records, the court, the Illinois State Police, or 17            the agency receiving such inquiry, shall reply as 18            it does in response to inquiries when no records 19            ever existed.20            (B) Upon entry of an order to expunge records 21        pursuant to subsection (b)(2)(B)(i) or (b)(2)(C), or 22        both:23                (i) the records shall be expunged (as defined 24            in subsection (a)(1)(E)) by the arresting agency 25            and any other agency as ordered by the court, 26            within 60 days of the date of service of the order,   HB0007- 26 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1            unless a motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider 2            the order is filed pursuant to paragraph (12) of 3            subsection (d) of this Section;4                (ii) the records of the circuit court clerk 5            shall be impounded until further order of the 6            court upon good cause shown and the name of the 7            petitioner obliterated on the official index 8            required to be kept by the circuit court clerk 9            under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts Act, but 10            the order shall not affect any index issued by the 11            circuit court clerk before the entry of the order;12                (iii) the records shall be impounded by the 13            Illinois State Police within 60 days of the date 14            of service of the order as ordered by the court, 15            unless a motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider 16            the order is filed pursuant to paragraph (12) of 17            subsection (d) of this Section;18                (iv) records impounded by the Illinois State 19            Police may be disseminated by the Illinois State 20            Police only as required by law or to the arresting 21            authority, the State's Attorney, and the court 22            upon a later arrest for the same or a similar 23            offense or for the purpose of sentencing for any 24            subsequent felony, and to the Department of 25            Corrections upon conviction for any offense; and26                (v) in response to an inquiry for such records   HB0007- 27 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1            from anyone not authorized by law to access such 2            records, the court, the Illinois State Police, or 3            the agency receiving such inquiry shall reply as 4            it does in response to inquiries when no records 5            ever existed.6            (B-5) Upon entry of an order to expunge records 7        under subsection (e-6):8                (i) the records shall be expunged (as defined 9            in subsection (a)(1)(E)) by the arresting agency 10            and any other agency as ordered by the court, 11            within 60 days of the date of service of the order, 12            unless a motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider 13            the order is filed under paragraph (12) of 14            subsection (d) of this Section;15                (ii) the records of the circuit court clerk 16            shall be impounded until further order of the 17            court upon good cause shown and the name of the 18            petitioner obliterated on the official index 19            required to be kept by the circuit court clerk 20            under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts Act, but 21            the order shall not affect any index issued by the 22            circuit court clerk before the entry of the order;23                (iii) the records shall be impounded by the 24            Illinois State Police within 60 days of the date 25            of service of the order as ordered by the court, 26            unless a motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider   HB0007- 28 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1            the order is filed under paragraph (12) of 2            subsection (d) of this Section;3                (iv) records impounded by the Illinois State 4            Police may be disseminated by the Illinois State 5            Police only as required by law or to the arresting 6            authority, the State's Attorney, and the court 7            upon a later arrest for the same or a similar 8            offense or for the purpose of sentencing for any 9            subsequent felony, and to the Department of 10            Corrections upon conviction for any offense; and11                (v) in response to an inquiry for these 12            records from anyone not authorized by law to 13            access the records, the court, the Illinois State 14            Police, or the agency receiving the inquiry shall 15            reply as it does in response to inquiries when no 16            records ever existed. 17            (C) Upon entry of an order to seal records under 18        subsection (c), the arresting agency, any other agency 19        as ordered by the court, the Illinois State Police, 20        and the court shall seal the records (as defined in 21        subsection (a)(1)(K)). In response to an inquiry for 22        such records, from anyone not authorized by law to 23        access such records, the court, the Illinois State 24        Police, or the agency receiving such inquiry shall 25        reply as it does in response to inquiries when no 26        records ever existed.  HB0007- 29 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1            (D) The Illinois State Police shall send written 2        notice to the petitioner of its compliance with each 3        order to expunge or seal records within 60 days of the 4        date of service of that order or, if a motion to 5        vacate, modify, or reconsider is filed, within 60 days 6        of service of the order resolving the motion, if that 7        order requires the Illinois State Police to expunge or 8        seal records. In the event of an appeal from the 9        circuit court order, the Illinois State Police shall 10        send written notice to the petitioner of its 11        compliance with an Appellate Court or Supreme Court 12        judgment to expunge or seal records within 60 days of 13        the issuance of the court's mandate. The notice is not 14        required while any motion to vacate, modify, or 15        reconsider, or any appeal or petition for 16        discretionary appellate review, is pending. 17            (E) Upon motion, the court may order that a sealed 18        judgment or other court record necessary to 19        demonstrate the amount of any legal financial 20        obligation due and owing be made available for the 21        limited purpose of collecting any legal financial 22        obligations owed by the petitioner that were 23        established, imposed, or originated in the criminal 24        proceeding for which those records have been sealed. 25        The records made available under this subparagraph (E) 26        shall not be entered into the official index required   HB0007- 30 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1        to be kept by the circuit court clerk under Section 16 2        of the Clerks of Courts Act and shall be immediately 3        re-impounded upon the collection of the outstanding 4        financial obligations. 5            (F) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 6        Section, a circuit court clerk may access a sealed 7        record for the limited purpose of collecting payment 8        for any legal financial obligations that were 9        established, imposed, or originated in the criminal 10        proceedings for which those records have been sealed. 11        (10) Fees. The Illinois State Police may charge the 12    petitioner a fee equivalent to the cost of processing any 13    order to expunge or seal records. Notwithstanding any 14    provision of the Clerks of Courts Act to the contrary, the 15    circuit court clerk may charge a fee equivalent to the 16    cost associated with the sealing or expungement of records 17    by the circuit court clerk. From the total filing fee 18    collected for the petition to seal or expunge, the circuit 19    court clerk shall deposit $10 into the Circuit Court Clerk 20    Operation and Administrative Fund, to be used to offset 21    the costs incurred by the circuit court clerk in 22    performing the additional duties required to serve the 23    petition to seal or expunge on all parties. The circuit 24    court clerk shall collect and remit the Illinois State 25    Police portion of the fee to the State Treasurer and it 26    shall be deposited in the State Police Services Fund. If   HB0007- 31 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    the record brought under an expungement petition was 2    previously sealed under this Section, the fee for the 3    expungement petition for that same record shall be waived. 4        (11) Final Order. No court order issued under the 5    expungement or sealing provisions of this Section shall 6    become final for purposes of appeal until 30 days after 7    service of the order on the petitioner and all parties 8    entitled to notice of the petition.9        (12) Motion to Vacate, Modify, or Reconsider. Under 10    Section 2-1203 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the 11    petitioner or any party entitled to notice may file a 12    motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider the order granting 13    or denying the petition to expunge or seal within 60 days 14    of service of the order. If filed more than 60 days after 15    service of the order, a petition to vacate, modify, or 16    reconsider shall comply with subsection (c) of Section 17    2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Upon filing of a 18    motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider, notice of the 19    motion shall be served upon the petitioner and all parties 20    entitled to notice of the petition. 21        (13) Effect of Order. An order granting a petition 22    under the expungement or sealing provisions of this 23    Section shall not be considered void because it fails to 24    comply with the provisions of this Section or because of 25    any error asserted in a motion to vacate, modify, or 26    reconsider. The circuit court retains jurisdiction to   HB0007- 32 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    determine whether the order is voidable and to vacate, 2    modify, or reconsider its terms based on a motion filed 3    under paragraph (12) of this subsection (d).4        (14) Compliance with Order Granting Petition to Seal 5    Records. Unless a court has entered a stay of an order 6    granting a petition to seal, all parties entitled to 7    notice of the petition must fully comply with the terms of 8    the order within 60 days of service of the order even if a 9    party is seeking relief from the order through a motion 10    filed under paragraph (12) of this subsection (d) or is 11    appealing the order.12        (15) Compliance with Order Granting Petition to 13    Expunge Records. While a party is seeking relief from the 14    order granting the petition to expunge through a motion 15    filed under paragraph (12) of this subsection (d) or is 16    appealing the order, and unless a court has entered a stay 17    of that order, the parties entitled to notice of the 18    petition must seal, but need not expunge, the records 19    until there is a final order on the motion for relief or, 20    in the case of an appeal, the issuance of that court's 21    mandate.22        (16) The changes to this subsection (d) made by Public 23    Act 98-163 apply to all petitions pending on August 5, 24    2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-163) and to all 25    orders ruling on a petition to expunge or seal on or after 26    August 5, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-163).   HB0007- 33 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    (e) Whenever a person who has been convicted of an offense 2is granted a pardon by the Governor which specifically 3authorizes expungement, he or she may, upon verified petition 4to the Chief Judge of the circuit where the person had been 5convicted, any judge of the circuit designated by the Chief 6Judge, or in counties of less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the 7presiding trial judge at the defendant's trial, have a court 8order entered expunging the record of arrest from the official 9records of the arresting authority and order that the records 10of the circuit court clerk and the Illinois State Police be 11sealed until further order of the court upon good cause shown 12or as otherwise provided herein, and the name of the defendant 13obliterated from the official index requested to be kept by 14the circuit court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of 15Courts Act in connection with the arrest and conviction for 16the offense for which he or she had been pardoned but the order 17shall not affect any index issued by the circuit court clerk 18before the entry of the order. All records sealed by the 19Illinois State Police may be disseminated by the Illinois 20State Police only to the arresting authority, the State's 21Attorney, and the court upon a later arrest for the same or 22similar offense or for the purpose of sentencing for any 23subsequent felony. Upon conviction for any subsequent offense, 24the Department of Corrections shall have access to all sealed 25records of the Illinois State Police pertaining to that 26individual. Upon entry of the order of expungement, the   HB0007- 34 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1circuit court clerk shall promptly mail a copy of the order to 2the person who was pardoned.3    (e-5) Whenever a person who has been convicted of an 4offense is granted a certificate of eligibility for sealing by 5the Prisoner Review Board which specifically authorizes 6sealing, he or she may, upon verified petition to the Chief 7Judge of the circuit where the person had been convicted, any 8judge of the circuit designated by the Chief Judge, or in 9counties of less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the presiding 10trial judge at the petitioner's trial, have a court order 11entered sealing the record of arrest from the official records 12of the arresting authority and order that the records of the 13circuit court clerk and the Illinois State Police be sealed 14until further order of the court upon good cause shown or as 15otherwise provided herein, and the name of the petitioner 16obliterated from the official index requested to be kept by 17the circuit court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of 18Courts Act in connection with the arrest and conviction for 19the offense for which he or she had been granted the 20certificate but the order shall not affect any index issued by 21the circuit court clerk before the entry of the order. All 22records sealed by the Illinois State Police may be 23disseminated by the Illinois State Police only as required by 24this Act or to the arresting authority, a law enforcement 25agency, the State's Attorney, and the court upon a later 26arrest for the same or similar offense or for the purpose of   HB0007- 35 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1sentencing for any subsequent felony. Upon conviction for any 2subsequent offense, the Department of Corrections shall have 3access to all sealed records of the Illinois State Police 4pertaining to that individual. Upon entry of the order of 5sealing, the circuit court clerk shall promptly mail a copy of 6the order to the person who was granted the certificate of 7eligibility for sealing. 8    (e-6) Whenever a person who has been convicted of an 9offense is granted a certificate of eligibility for 10expungement by the Prisoner Review Board which specifically 11authorizes expungement, he or she may, upon verified petition 12to the Chief Judge of the circuit where the person had been 13convicted, any judge of the circuit designated by the Chief 14Judge, or in counties of less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the 15presiding trial judge at the petitioner's trial, have a court 16order entered expunging the record of arrest from the official 17records of the arresting authority and order that the records 18of the circuit court clerk and the Illinois State Police be 19sealed until further order of the court upon good cause shown 20or as otherwise provided herein, and the name of the 21petitioner obliterated from the official index requested to be 22kept by the circuit court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks 23of Courts Act in connection with the arrest and conviction for 24the offense for which he or she had been granted the 25certificate but the order shall not affect any index issued by 26the circuit court clerk before the entry of the order. All   HB0007- 36 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1records sealed by the Illinois State Police may be 2disseminated by the Illinois State Police only as required by 3this Act or to the arresting authority, a law enforcement 4agency, the State's Attorney, and the court upon a later 5arrest for the same or similar offense or for the purpose of 6sentencing for any subsequent felony. Upon conviction for any 7subsequent offense, the Department of Corrections shall have 8access to all expunged records of the Illinois State Police 9pertaining to that individual. Upon entry of the order of 10expungement, the circuit court clerk shall promptly mail a 11copy of the order to the person who was granted the certificate 12of eligibility for expungement. 13    (f) Subject to available funding, the Illinois Department 14of Corrections shall conduct a study of the impact of sealing, 15especially on employment and recidivism rates, utilizing a 16random sample of those who apply for the sealing of their 17criminal records under Public Act 93-211. At the request of 18the Illinois Department of Corrections, records of the 19Illinois Department of Employment Security shall be utilized 20as appropriate to assist in the study. The study shall not 21disclose any data in a manner that would allow the 22identification of any particular individual or employing unit. 23The study shall be made available to the General Assembly no 24later than September 1, 2010.25    (g) Immediate Sealing.26        (1) Applicability. Notwithstanding any other provision   HB0007- 37 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    of this Act to the contrary, and cumulative with any 2    rights to expungement or sealing of criminal records, this 3    subsection authorizes the immediate sealing of criminal 4    records of adults and of minors prosecuted as adults.5        (2) Eligible Records. Arrests or charges not initiated 6    by arrest resulting in acquittal or dismissal with 7    prejudice, except as excluded by subsection (a)(3)(B), 8    that occur on or after January 1, 2018 (the effective date 9    of Public Act 100-282), may be sealed immediately if the 10    petition is filed with the circuit court clerk on the same 11    day and during the same hearing in which the case is 12    disposed.13        (3) When Records are Eligible to be Immediately 14    Sealed. Eligible records under paragraph (2) of this 15    subsection (g) may be sealed immediately after entry of 16    the final disposition of a case, notwithstanding the 17    disposition of other charges in the same case.18        (4) Notice of Eligibility for Immediate Sealing. Upon 19    entry of a disposition for an eligible record under this 20    subsection (g), the defendant shall be informed by the 21    court of his or her right to have eligible records 22    immediately sealed and the procedure for the immediate 23    sealing of these records.24        (5) Procedure. The following procedures apply to 25    immediate sealing under this subsection (g).26            (A) Filing the Petition. Upon entry of the final   HB0007- 38 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1        disposition of the case, the defendant's attorney may 2        immediately petition the court, on behalf of the 3        defendant, for immediate sealing of eligible records 4        under paragraph (2) of this subsection (g) that are 5        entered on or after January 1, 2018 (the effective 6        date of Public Act 100-282). The immediate sealing 7        petition may be filed with the circuit court clerk 8        during the hearing in which the final disposition of 9        the case is entered. If the defendant's attorney does 10        not file the petition for immediate sealing during the 11        hearing, the defendant may file a petition for sealing 12        at any time as authorized under subsection (c)(3)(A).13            (B) Contents of Petition. The immediate sealing 14        petition shall be verified and shall contain the 15        petitioner's name, date of birth, current address, and 16        for each eligible record, the case number, the date of 17        arrest if applicable, the identity of the arresting 18        authority if applicable, and other information as the 19        court may require.20            (C) Drug Test. The petitioner shall not be 21        required to attach proof that he or she has passed a 22        drug test.23            (D) Service of Petition. A copy of the petition 24        shall be served on the State's Attorney in open court. 25        The petitioner shall not be required to serve a copy of 26        the petition on any other agency.  HB0007- 39 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1            (E) Entry of Order. The presiding trial judge 2        shall enter an order granting or denying the petition 3        for immediate sealing during the hearing in which it 4        is filed. Petitions for immediate sealing shall be 5        ruled on in the same hearing in which the final 6        disposition of the case is entered.7            (F) Hearings. The court shall hear the petition 8        for immediate sealing on the same day and during the 9        same hearing in which the disposition is rendered.10            (G) Service of Order. An order to immediately seal 11        eligible records shall be served in conformance with 12        subsection (d)(8).13            (H) Implementation of Order. An order to 14        immediately seal records shall be implemented in 15        conformance with subsections (d)(9)(C) and (d)(9)(D).16            (I) Fees. The fee imposed by the circuit court 17        clerk and the Illinois State Police shall comply with 18        paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of this Section.19            (J) Final Order. No court order issued under this 20        subsection (g) shall become final for purposes of 21        appeal until 30 days after service of the order on the 22        petitioner and all parties entitled to service of the 23        order in conformance with subsection (d)(8).24            (K) Motion to Vacate, Modify, or Reconsider. Under 25        Section 2-1203 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the 26        petitioner, State's Attorney, or the Illinois State   HB0007- 40 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1        Police may file a motion to vacate, modify, or 2        reconsider the order denying the petition to 3        immediately seal within 60 days of service of the 4        order. If filed more than 60 days after service of the 5        order, a petition to vacate, modify, or reconsider 6        shall comply with subsection (c) of Section 2-1401 of 7        the Code of Civil Procedure.8            (L) Effect of Order. An order granting an 9        immediate sealing petition shall not be considered 10        void because it fails to comply with the provisions of 11        this Section or because of an error asserted in a 12        motion to vacate, modify, or reconsider. The circuit 13        court retains jurisdiction to determine whether the 14        order is voidable, and to vacate, modify, or 15        reconsider its terms based on a motion filed under 16        subparagraph (L) of this subsection (g).17            (M) Compliance with Order Granting Petition to 18        Seal Records. Unless a court has entered a stay of an 19        order granting a petition to immediately seal, all 20        parties entitled to service of the order must fully 21        comply with the terms of the order within 60 days of 22        service of the order. 23    (h) Sealing or vacation and expungement of trafficking 24victims' crimes.25        (1) A trafficking victim, as defined by paragraph (10) 26    of subsection (a) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of   HB0007- 41 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    2012, may petition for vacation and expungement or 2    immediate sealing of his or her criminal record upon the 3    completion of his or her last sentence if his or her 4    participation in the underlying offense was a result of 5    human trafficking under Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code 6    of 2012 or a severe form of trafficking under the federal 7    Trafficking Victims Protection Act. 8        (1.5) A petition under paragraph (1) shall be 9    prepared, signed, and filed in accordance with Supreme 10    Court Rule 9. The court may allow the petitioner to attend 11    any required hearing remotely in accordance with local 12    rules. The court may allow a petition to be filed under 13    seal if the public filing of the petition would constitute 14    a risk of harm to the petitioner.15        (2) A petitioner under this subsection (h), in 16    addition to the requirements provided under paragraph (4) 17    of subsection (d) of this Section, shall include in his or 18    her petition a clear and concise statement that: (A) he or 19    she was a victim of human trafficking at the time of the 20    offense; and (B) that his or her participation in the 21    offense was a result of human trafficking under Section 22    10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012 or a severe form of 23    trafficking under the federal Trafficking Victims 24    Protection Act. 25        (3) If an objection is filed alleging that the 26    petitioner is not entitled to vacation and expungement or   HB0007- 42 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    immediate sealing under this subsection (h), the court 2    shall conduct a hearing under paragraph (7) of subsection 3    (d) of this Section and the court shall determine whether 4    the petitioner is entitled to vacation and expungement or 5    immediate sealing under this subsection (h). A petitioner 6    is eligible for vacation and expungement or immediate 7    relief under this subsection (h) if he or she shows, by a 8    preponderance of the evidence, that: (A) he or she was a 9    victim of human trafficking at the time of the offense; 10    and (B) that his or her participation in the offense was a 11    result of human trafficking under Section 10-9 of the 12    Criminal Code of 2012 or a severe form of trafficking 13    under the federal Trafficking Victims Protection Act.14    (i) Minor Cannabis Offenses under the Cannabis Control 15Act.16        (1) Expungement of Arrest Records of Minor Cannabis 17    Offenses.18            (A) The Illinois State Police and all law 19        enforcement agencies within the State shall 20        automatically expunge all criminal history records of 21        an arrest, charge not initiated by arrest, order of 22        supervision, or order of qualified probation for a 23        Minor Cannabis Offense committed prior to June 25, 24        2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27) if:25                (i) One year or more has elapsed since the 26            date of the arrest or law enforcement interaction   HB0007- 43 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1            documented in the records; and2                (ii) No criminal charges were filed relating 3            to the arrest or law enforcement interaction or 4            criminal charges were filed and subsequently 5            dismissed or vacated or the arrestee was 6            acquitted.7            (B) If the law enforcement agency is unable to 8        verify satisfaction of condition (ii) in paragraph 9        (A), records that satisfy condition (i) in paragraph 10        (A) shall be automatically expunged.11            (C) Records shall be expunged by the law 12        enforcement agency under the following timelines:13                (i) Records created prior to June 25, 2019 14            (the effective date of Public Act 101-27), but on 15            or after January 1, 2013, shall be automatically 16            expunged prior to January 1, 2021;17                (ii) Records created prior to January 1, 2013, 18            but on or after January 1, 2000, shall be 19            automatically expunged prior to January 1, 2023;20                (iii) Records created prior to January 1, 2000 21            shall be automatically expunged prior to January 22            1, 2025.23            In response to an inquiry for expunged records, 24        the law enforcement agency receiving such inquiry 25        shall reply as it does in response to inquiries when no 26        records ever existed; however, it shall provide a   HB0007- 44 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1        certificate of disposition or confirmation that the 2        record was expunged to the individual whose record was 3        expunged if such a record exists. 4            (D) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 5        restrict or modify an individual's right to have that 6        individual's records expunged except as otherwise may 7        be provided in this Act, or diminish or abrogate any 8        rights or remedies otherwise available to the 9        individual.10        (2) Pardons Authorizing Expungement of Minor Cannabis 11    Offenses.12            (A) Upon June 25, 2019 (the effective date of 13        Public Act 101-27), the Department of State Police 14        shall review all criminal history record information 15        and identify all records that meet all of the 16        following criteria:17                (i) one or more convictions for a Minor 18            Cannabis Offense;19                (ii) the conviction identified in paragraph 20            (2)(A)(i) did not include a penalty enhancement 21            under Section 7 of the Cannabis Control Act; and22                (iii) the conviction identified in paragraph 23            (2)(A)(i) is not associated with a conviction for 24            a violent crime as defined in subsection (c) of 25            Section 3 of the Rights of Crime Victims and 26            Witnesses Act.  HB0007- 45 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1            (B) Within 180 days after June 25, 2019 (the 2        effective date of Public Act 101-27), the Department 3        of State Police shall notify the Prisoner Review Board 4        of all such records that meet the criteria established 5        in paragraph (2)(A).6                (i) The Prisoner Review Board shall notify the 7            State's Attorney of the county of conviction of 8            each record identified by State Police in 9            paragraph (2)(A) that is classified as a Class 4 10            felony. The State's Attorney may provide a written 11            objection to the Prisoner Review Board on the sole 12            basis that the record identified does not meet the 13            criteria established in paragraph (2)(A). Such an 14            objection must be filed within 60 days or by such 15            later date set by the Prisoner Review Board in the 16            notice after the State's Attorney received notice 17            from the Prisoner Review Board.18                (ii) In response to a written objection from a 19            State's Attorney, the Prisoner Review Board is 20            authorized to conduct a non-public hearing to 21            evaluate the information provided in the 22            objection.23                (iii) The Prisoner Review Board shall make a 24            confidential and privileged recommendation to the 25            Governor as to whether to grant a pardon 26            authorizing expungement for each of the records   HB0007- 46 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1            identified by the Department of State Police as 2            described in paragraph (2)(A).3            (C) If an individual has been granted a pardon 4        authorizing expungement as described in this Section, 5        the Prisoner Review Board, through the Attorney 6        General, shall file a petition for expungement with 7        the Chief Judge of the circuit or any judge of the 8        circuit designated by the Chief Judge where the 9        individual had been convicted. Such petition may 10        include more than one individual. Whenever an 11        individual who has been convicted of an offense is 12        granted a pardon by the Governor that specifically 13        authorizes expungement, an objection to the petition 14        may not be filed. Petitions to expunge under this 15        subsection (i) may include more than one individual. 16        Within 90 days of the filing of such a petition, the 17        court shall enter an order expunging the records of 18        arrest from the official records of the arresting 19        authority and order that the records of the circuit 20        court clerk and the Illinois State Police be expunged 21        and the name of the defendant obliterated from the 22        official index requested to be kept by the circuit 23        court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts 24        Act in connection with the arrest and conviction for 25        the offense for which the individual had received a 26        pardon but the order shall not affect any index issued   HB0007- 47 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1        by the circuit court clerk before the entry of the 2        order. Upon entry of the order of expungement, the 3        circuit court clerk shall promptly provide a copy of 4        the order and a certificate of disposition to the 5        individual who was pardoned to the individual's last 6        known address or by electronic means (if available) or 7        otherwise make it available to the individual upon 8        request.9            (D) Nothing in this Section is intended to 10        diminish or abrogate any rights or remedies otherwise 11        available to the individual.12        (3) Any individual may file a motion to vacate and 13    expunge a conviction for a misdemeanor or Class 4 felony 14    violation of Section 4 or Section 5 of the Cannabis 15    Control Act. Motions to vacate and expunge under this 16    subsection (i) may be filed with the circuit court, Chief 17    Judge of a judicial circuit or any judge of the circuit 18    designated by the Chief Judge. The circuit court clerk 19    shall promptly serve a copy of the motion to vacate and 20    expunge, and any supporting documentation, on the State's 21    Attorney or prosecutor charged with the duty of 22    prosecuting the offense. When considering such a motion to 23    vacate and expunge, a court shall consider the following: 24    the reasons to retain the records provided by law 25    enforcement, the petitioner's age, the petitioner's age at 26    the time of offense, the time since the conviction, and   HB0007- 48 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    the specific adverse consequences if denied. An individual 2    may file such a petition after the completion of any 3    non-financial sentence or non-financial condition imposed 4    by the conviction. Within 60 days of the filing of such 5    motion, a State's Attorney may file an objection to such a 6    petition along with supporting evidence. If a motion to 7    vacate and expunge is granted, the records shall be 8    expunged in accordance with subparagraphs (d)(8) and 9    (d)(9)(A) of this Section. An agency providing civil legal 10    aid, as defined by Section 15 of the Public Interest 11    Attorney Assistance Act, assisting individuals seeking to 12    file a motion to vacate and expunge under this subsection 13    may file motions to vacate and expunge with the Chief 14    Judge of a judicial circuit or any judge of the circuit 15    designated by the Chief Judge, and the motion may include 16    more than one individual. Motions filed by an agency 17    providing civil legal aid concerning more than one 18    individual may be prepared, presented, and signed 19    electronically.20        (4) Any State's Attorney may file a motion to vacate 21    and expunge a conviction for a misdemeanor or Class 4 22    felony violation of Section 4 or Section 5 of the Cannabis 23    Control Act. Motions to vacate and expunge under this 24    subsection (i) may be filed with the circuit court, Chief 25    Judge of a judicial circuit or any judge of the circuit 26    designated by the Chief Judge, and may include more than   HB0007- 49 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    one individual. Motions filed by a State's Attorney 2    concerning more than one individual may be prepared, 3    presented, and signed electronically. When considering 4    such a motion to vacate and expunge, a court shall 5    consider the following: the reasons to retain the records 6    provided by law enforcement, the individual's age, the 7    individual's age at the time of offense, the time since 8    the conviction, and the specific adverse consequences if 9    denied. Upon entry of an order granting a motion to vacate 10    and expunge records pursuant to this Section, the State's 11    Attorney shall notify the Prisoner Review Board within 30 12    days. Upon entry of the order of expungement, the circuit 13    court clerk shall promptly provide a copy of the order and 14    a certificate of disposition to the individual whose 15    records will be expunged to the individual's last known 16    address or by electronic means (if available) or otherwise 17    make available to the individual upon request. If a motion 18    to vacate and expunge is granted, the records shall be 19    expunged in accordance with subparagraphs (d)(8) and 20    (d)(9)(A) of this Section.21        (5) In the public interest, the State's Attorney of a 22    county has standing to file motions to vacate and expunge 23    pursuant to this Section in the circuit court with 24    jurisdiction over the underlying conviction.25        (6) If a person is arrested for a Minor Cannabis 26    Offense as defined in this Section before June 25, 2019   HB0007- 50 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    (the effective date of Public Act 101-27) and the person's 2    case is still pending but a sentence has not been imposed, 3    the person may petition the court in which the charges are 4    pending for an order to summarily dismiss those charges 5    against him or her, and expunge all official records of 6    his or her arrest, plea, trial, conviction, incarceration, 7    supervision, or expungement. If the court determines, upon 8    review, that: (A) the person was arrested before June 25, 9    2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27) for an 10    offense that has been made eligible for expungement; (B) 11    the case is pending at the time; and (C) the person has not 12    been sentenced of the minor cannabis violation eligible 13    for expungement under this subsection, the court shall 14    consider the following: the reasons to retain the records 15    provided by law enforcement, the petitioner's age, the 16    petitioner's age at the time of offense, the time since 17    the conviction, and the specific adverse consequences if 18    denied. If a motion to dismiss and expunge is granted, the 19    records shall be expunged in accordance with subparagraph 20    (d)(9)(A) of this Section.21        (7) A person imprisoned solely as a result of one or 22    more convictions for Minor Cannabis Offenses under this 23    subsection (i) shall be released from incarceration upon 24    the issuance of an order under this subsection.25        (8) The Illinois State Police shall allow a person to 26    use the access and review process, established in the   HB0007- 51 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    Illinois State Police, for verifying that his or her 2    records relating to Minor Cannabis Offenses of the 3    Cannabis Control Act eligible under this Section have been 4    expunged.5        (9) No conviction vacated pursuant to this Section 6    shall serve as the basis for damages for time unjustly 7    served as provided in the Court of Claims Act. 8        (10) Effect of Expungement. A person's right to 9    expunge an expungeable offense shall not be limited under 10    this Section. The effect of an order of expungement shall 11    be to restore the person to the status he or she occupied 12    before the arrest, charge, or conviction.13        (11) Information. The Illinois State Police shall post 14    general information on its website about the expungement 15    process described in this subsection (i). 16    (j) Felony Prostitution Convictions.17        (1) Any individual may file a motion to vacate and 18    expunge a conviction for a prior Class 4 felony violation 19    of prostitution. Motions to vacate and expunge under this 20    subsection (j) may be filed with the circuit court, Chief 21    Judge of a judicial circuit, or any judge of the circuit 22    designated by the Chief Judge. When considering the motion 23    to vacate and expunge, a court shall consider the 24    following:25            (A) the reasons to retain the records provided by 26        law enforcement;  HB0007- 52 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1            (B) the petitioner's age;2            (C) the petitioner's age at the time of offense; 3        and4            (D) the time since the conviction, and the 5        specific adverse consequences if denied. An individual 6        may file the petition after the completion of any 7        sentence or condition imposed by the conviction. 8        Within 60 days of the filing of the motion, a State's 9        Attorney may file an objection to the petition along 10        with supporting evidence. If a motion to vacate and 11        expunge is granted, the records shall be expunged in 12        accordance with subparagraph (d)(9)(A) of this 13        Section. An agency providing civil legal aid, as 14        defined in Section 15 of the Public Interest Attorney 15        Assistance Act, assisting individuals seeking to file 16        a motion to vacate and expunge under this subsection 17        may file motions to vacate and expunge with the Chief 18        Judge of a judicial circuit or any judge of the circuit 19        designated by the Chief Judge, and the motion may 20        include more than one individual.21        (2) Any State's Attorney may file a motion to vacate 22    and expunge a conviction for a Class 4 felony violation of 23    prostitution. Motions to vacate and expunge under this 24    subsection (j) may be filed with the circuit court, Chief 25    Judge of a judicial circuit, or any judge of the circuit 26    court designated by the Chief Judge, and may include more   HB0007- 53 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    than one individual. When considering the motion to vacate 2    and expunge, a court shall consider the following reasons:3            (A) the reasons to retain the records provided by 4        law enforcement;5            (B) the petitioner's age;6            (C) the petitioner's age at the time of offense;7            (D) the time since the conviction; and8            (E) the specific adverse consequences if denied.9        If the State's Attorney files a motion to vacate and 10    expunge records for felony prostitution convictions 11    pursuant to this Section, the State's Attorney shall 12    notify the Prisoner Review Board within 30 days of the 13    filing. If a motion to vacate and expunge is granted, the 14    records shall be expunged in accordance with subparagraph 15    (d)(9)(A) of this Section.16        (3) In the public interest, the State's Attorney of a 17    county has standing to file motions to vacate and expunge 18    pursuant to this Section in the circuit court with 19    jurisdiction over the underlying conviction.20        (4) The Illinois State Police shall allow a person to 21    a use the access and review process, established in the 22    Illinois State Police, for verifying that his or her 23    records relating to felony prostitution eligible under 24    this Section have been expunged.25        (5) No conviction vacated pursuant to this Section 26    shall serve as the basis for damages for time unjustly   HB0007- 54 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    served as provided in the Court of Claims Act.2        (6) Effect of Expungement. A person's right to expunge 3    an expungeable offense shall not be limited under this 4    Section. The effect of an order of expungement shall be to 5    restore the person to the status he or she occupied before 6    the arrest, charge, or conviction.7        (7) Information. The Illinois State Police shall post 8    general information on its website about the expungement 9    process described in this subsection (j).10(Source: P.A. 102-145, eff. 7-23-21; 102-558, 8-20-21; 11102-639, eff. 8-27-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-933, eff. 121-1-23; 103-35, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-609, 13eff. 7-1-24; 103-755, eff. 8-2-24; revised 8-9-24.) 14    Section 10. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 15changing Section 3-3-2 as follows: 16    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-2)17    Sec. 3-3-2. Powers and duties. 18    (a) The Parole and Pardon Board is abolished and the term 19"Parole and Pardon Board" as used in any law of Illinois, shall 20read "Prisoner Review Board." After February 1, 1978 (the 21effective date of Public Act 81-1099), the Prisoner Review 22Board shall provide by rule for the orderly transition of all 23files, records, and documents of the Parole and Pardon Board 24and for such other steps as may be necessary to effect an   HB0007- 55 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1orderly transition and shall:2        (1) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 3    at least 3 members decide, cases of prisoners who were 4    sentenced under the law in effect prior to February 1, 5    1978 (the effective date of Public Act 81-1099), and who 6    are eligible for parole;7        (2) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 8    at least 3 members decide, the conditions of parole and 9    the time of discharge from parole, impose sanctions for 10    violations of parole, and revoke parole for those 11    sentenced under the law in effect prior to February 1, 12    1978 (the effective date of Public Act 81-1099); provided 13    that the decision to parole and the conditions of parole 14    for all prisoners who were sentenced for first degree 15    murder or who received a minimum sentence of 20 years or 16    more under the law in effect prior to February 1, 1978 17    shall be determined by a majority vote of the Prisoner 18    Review Board. One representative supporting parole and one 19    representative opposing parole will be allowed to speak. 20    Their comments shall be limited to making corrections and 21    filling in omissions to the Board's presentation and 22    discussion;23        (3) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 24    at least 3 members decide, the conditions of mandatory 25    supervised release and the time of discharge from 26    mandatory supervised release, impose sanctions for   HB0007- 56 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    violations of mandatory supervised release, and revoke 2    mandatory supervised release for those sentenced under the 3    law in effect after February 1, 1978 (the effective date 4    of Public Act 81-1099);5        (3.5) hear by at least one member and through a panel 6    of at least 3 members decide, the conditions of mandatory 7    supervised release and the time of discharge from 8    mandatory supervised release, to impose sanctions for 9    violations of mandatory supervised release and revoke 10    mandatory supervised release for those serving extended 11    supervised release terms pursuant to paragraph (4) of 12    subsection (d) of Section 5-8-1; 13        (3.6) hear by at least one member and through a panel 14    of at least 3 members decide whether to revoke aftercare 15    release for those committed to the Department of Juvenile 16    Justice under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987; 17        (4) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 18    at least 3 members, decide cases brought by the Department 19    of Corrections against a prisoner in the custody of the 20    Department for alleged violation of Department rules with 21    respect to sentence credits under Section 3-6-3 of this 22    Code in which the Department seeks to revoke sentence 23    credits, if the amount of time at issue exceeds 30 days or 24    when, during any 12-month period, the cumulative amount of 25    credit revoked exceeds 30 days except where the infraction 26    is committed or discovered within 60 days of scheduled   HB0007- 57 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    release. In such cases, the Department of Corrections may 2    revoke up to 30 days of sentence credit. The Board may 3    subsequently approve the revocation of additional sentence 4    credit, if the Department seeks to revoke sentence credit 5    in excess of 30 days. However, the Board shall not be 6    empowered to review the Department's decision with respect 7    to the loss of 30 days of sentence credit for any prisoner 8    or to increase any penalty beyond the length requested by 9    the Department;10        (5) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 11    at least 3 members decide, the release dates for certain 12    prisoners sentenced under the law in existence prior to 13    February 1, 1978 (the effective date of Public Act 14    81-1099), in accordance with Section 3-3-2.1 of this Code;15        (6) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 16    at least 3 members decide, all requests for pardon, 17    reprieve or commutation, and make confidential 18    recommendations to the Governor;19        (6.5) hear by at least one member who is qualified in 20    the field of juvenile matters and through a panel of at 21    least 3 members, 2 of whom are qualified in the field of 22    juvenile matters, decide parole review cases in accordance 23    with Section 5-4.5-115 of this Code and make release 24    determinations of persons under the age of 21 at the time 25    of the commission of an offense or offenses, other than 26    those persons serving sentences for first degree murder or   HB0007- 58 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    aggravated criminal sexual assault; 2        (6.6) hear by at least a quorum of the Prisoner Review 3    Board and decide by a majority of members present at the 4    hearing, in accordance with Section 5-4.5-115 of this 5    Code, release determinations of persons under the age of 6    21 at the time of the commission of an offense or offenses 7    of those persons serving sentences for first degree murder 8    or aggravated criminal sexual assault; 9        (7) comply with the requirements of the Open Parole 10    Hearings Act;11        (8) hear by at least one member and, through a panel of 12    at least 3 members, decide cases brought by the Department 13    of Corrections against a prisoner in the custody of the 14    Department for court dismissal of a frivolous lawsuit 15    pursuant to Section 3-6-3(d) of this Code in which the 16    Department seeks to revoke up to 180 days of sentence 17    credit, and if the prisoner has not accumulated 180 days 18    of sentence credit at the time of the dismissal, then all 19    sentence credit accumulated by the prisoner shall be 20    revoked;21        (9) hear by at least 3 members, and, through a panel of 22    at least 3 members, decide whether to grant certificates 23    of relief from disabilities or certificates of good 24    conduct as provided in Article 5.5 of Chapter V;25        (10) upon a petition by a person who has been 26    convicted of a Class 3 or Class 4 felony and who meets the   HB0007- 59 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    requirements of this paragraph, hear by at least 3 members 2    and, with the unanimous vote of a panel of 3 members, issue 3    a certificate of eligibility for sealing recommending that 4    the court order the sealing of all official records of the 5    arresting authority, the circuit court clerk, and the 6    Illinois State Police concerning the arrest and conviction 7    for the Class 3 or 4 felony. A person may not apply to the 8    Board for a certificate of eligibility for sealing:9            (A) until 5 years have elapsed since the 10        expiration of his or her sentence;11            (B) until 5 years have elapsed since any arrests 12        or detentions by a law enforcement officer for an 13        alleged violation of law, other than a petty offense, 14        traffic offense, conservation offense, or local 15        ordinance offense;16            (C) if convicted of a violation of the Cannabis 17        Control Act, Illinois Controlled Substances Act, the 18        Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 19        the Methamphetamine Precursor Control Act, or the 20        Methamphetamine Precursor Tracking Act unless the 21        petitioner has completed a drug abuse program for the 22        offense on which sealing is sought and provides proof 23        that he or she has completed the program successfully;24            (D) if convicted of:25                (i) a sex offense described in Article 11 or 26            Sections 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, or 12-16 of   HB0007- 60 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1            the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2            2012;3                (ii) aggravated assault;4                (iii) aggravated battery;5                (iv) domestic battery;6                (v) aggravated domestic battery;7                (vi) violation of an order of protection;8                (vii) an offense under the Criminal Code of 9            1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 involving a 10            firearm; 11                (viii) driving while under the influence of 12            alcohol, other drug or drugs, intoxicating 13            compound or compounds, or any combination thereof;14                (ix) aggravated driving while under the 15            influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, 16            intoxicating compound or compounds, or any 17            combination thereof; or18                (x) any crime defined as a crime of violence 19            under Section 2 of the Crime Victims Compensation 20            Act.21        If a person has applied to the Board for a certificate 22    of eligibility for sealing and the Board denies the 23    certificate, the person must wait at least 4 years before 24    filing again or filing for pardon from the Governor unless 25    the Chairman of the Prisoner Review Board grants a waiver.26        The decision to issue or refrain from issuing a   HB0007- 61 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    certificate of eligibility for sealing shall be at the 2    Board's sole discretion, and shall not give rise to any 3    cause of action against either the Board or its members.4        The Board may only authorize the sealing of Class 3 5    and 4 felony convictions of the petitioner from one 6    information or indictment under this paragraph (10). A 7    petitioner may only receive one certificate of eligibility 8    for sealing under this provision for life; and9        (11) upon a petition by a person who has after having 10    been convicted of a Class 3 or Class 4 felony thereafter 11    served in the United States Armed Forces or National Guard 12    of this or any other state and had received an honorable 13    discharge from the United States Armed Forces or National 14    Guard or who at the time of filing the petition is enlisted 15    in the United States Armed Forces or National Guard of 16    this or any other state and served one tour of duty and who 17    meets the requirements of this paragraph, hear by at least 18    3 members and, with the unanimous vote of a panel of 3 19    members, issue a certificate of eligibility for 20    expungement requiring recommending that the court order 21    the expungement of all official records of the arresting 22    authority, the circuit court clerk, and the Illinois State 23    Police concerning the arrest and conviction for the Class 24    3 or 4 felony. A person may not apply to the Board for a 25    certificate of eligibility for expungement if convicted 26    of:  HB0007- 62 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1            (A) if convicted of:2                (i) a sex offense described in Article 11 or 3            Sections 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, or 12-16 of 4            the Criminal Code of 1961 or Criminal Code of 5            2012;6                (ii) an offense under the Criminal Code of 7            1961 or Criminal Code of 2012 involving a firearm; 8            or9                (iii) a crime of violence as defined in 10            Section 2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act; 11            or12                (iv) an offense involving domestic violence as 13            defined in Section 112A-3 of the Code of Criminal 14            Procedure of 1963, including aggravated assault, 15            aggravated battery, violation of an order of 16            protection, domestic battery, or aggravated 17            domestic battery. 18            (B) if the person has not served in the United 19        States Armed Forces or National Guard of this or any 20        other state or has not received an honorable discharge 21        from the United States Armed Forces or National Guard 22        of this or any other state or who at the time of the 23        filing of the petition is serving in the United States 24        Armed Forces or National Guard of this or any other 25        state and has not completed one tour of duty.26        If a person has applied to the Board for a certificate   HB0007- 63 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    of eligibility for expungement and the Board denies the 2    certificate, the person must wait at least 4 years before 3    filing again or filing for a pardon with authorization for 4    expungement from the Governor unless the Governor or 5    Chairman of the Prisoner Review Board grants a waiver. 6    (a-5) The Prisoner Review Board, with the cooperation of 7and in coordination with the Department of Corrections and the 8Department of Central Management Services, shall implement a 9pilot project in 3 correctional institutions providing for the 10conduct of hearings under paragraphs (1) and (4) of subsection 11(a) of this Section through interactive video conferences. The 12project shall be implemented within 6 months after January 1, 131997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-490). Within 6 14months after the implementation of the pilot project, the 15Prisoner Review Board, with the cooperation of and in 16coordination with the Department of Corrections and the 17Department of Central Management Services, shall report to the 18Governor and the General Assembly regarding the use, costs, 19effectiveness, and future viability of interactive video 20conferences for Prisoner Review Board hearings.21    (b) Upon recommendation of the Department the Board may 22restore sentence credit previously revoked.23    (c) The Board shall cooperate with the Department in 24promoting an effective system of parole and mandatory 25supervised release.26    (d) The Board shall promulgate rules for the conduct of   HB0007- 64 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1its work, and the Chairman shall file a copy of such rules and 2any amendments thereto with the Director and with the 3Secretary of State.4    (e) The Board shall keep records of all of its official 5actions and shall make them accessible in accordance with law 6and the rules of the Board.7    (f) The Board or one who has allegedly violated the 8conditions of his or her parole, aftercare release, or 9mandatory supervised release may require by subpoena the 10attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of 11documentary evidence relating to any matter under 12investigation or hearing. The Chairman of the Board may sign 13subpoenas which shall be served by any agent or public 14official authorized by the Chairman of the Board, or by any 15person lawfully authorized to serve a subpoena under the laws 16of the State of Illinois. The attendance of witnesses, and the 17production of documentary evidence, may be required from any 18place in the State to a hearing location in the State before 19the Chairman of the Board or his or her designated agent or 20agents or any duly constituted Committee or Subcommittee of 21the Board. Witnesses so summoned shall be paid the same fees 22and mileage that are paid witnesses in the circuit courts of 23the State, and witnesses whose depositions are taken and the 24persons taking those depositions are each entitled to the same 25fees as are paid for like services in actions in the circuit 26courts of the State. Fees and mileage shall be vouchered for   HB0007- 65 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1payment when the witness is discharged from further 2attendance.3    In case of disobedience to a subpoena, the Board may 4petition any circuit court of the State for an order requiring 5the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of 6documentary evidence or both. A copy of such petition shall be 7served by personal service or by registered or certified mail 8upon the person who has failed to obey the subpoena, and such 9person shall be advised in writing that a hearing upon the 10petition will be requested in a court room to be designated in 11such notice before the judge hearing motions or extraordinary 12remedies at a specified time, on a specified date, not less 13than 10 nor more than 15 days after the deposit of the copy of 14the written notice and petition in the U.S. mail addressed to 15the person at his or her last known address or after the 16personal service of the copy of the notice and petition upon 17such person. The court upon the filing of such a petition, may 18order the person refusing to obey the subpoena to appear at an 19investigation or hearing, or to there produce documentary 20evidence, if so ordered, or to give evidence relative to the 21subject matter of that investigation or hearing. Any failure 22to obey such order of the circuit court may be punished by that 23court as a contempt of court.24    Each member of the Board and any hearing officer 25designated by the Board shall have the power to administer 26oaths and to take the testimony of persons under oath.  HB0007- 66 -LRB104 03383 RLC 13405 b1    (g) Except under subsection (a) of this Section, a 2majority of the members then appointed to the Prisoner Review 3Board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all 4business of the Board.5    (h) The Prisoner Review Board shall annually transmit to 6the Director a detailed report of its work for the preceding 7calendar year. The annual report shall also be transmitted to 8the Governor for submission to the Legislature.9(Source: P.A. 101-288, eff. 1-1-20; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 10102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)